Maine, session 132, LD1608.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2422-B is enacted to read:
§2422-B. Prohibited locations; registration not issued
The department may not register and issue a registry identification card or a registration
certificate to any person that would be authorized under that registry identification card or
registration certificate to cultivate cannabis at a geographical location that has been the site
of repeated violations under this chapter or under Title 28-B, chapter 1, the rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter or Title 28-B, chapter 1 or any other applicable state or local law,
rule or regulation. The department may place a moratorium for a period not to exceed 10
years on any such geographical location for the purpose of the cultivation of cannabis under
this chapter by a person issued a registry identification card or a registration certificate.
Sec. 2. 28-B MRSA §203, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Geographical location; cultivation facility. An applicant for a cultivation facility
license shall submit information regarding the proposed geographical location for the
cultivation facility.
Sec. 3. 28-B MRSA §203-B is enacted to read:
§203-B. Moratorium on geographical location
The office may place a moratorium for a period not to exceed 10 years on any
geographical location that has been the site of repeated violations under this chapter or
under Title 22, chapter 558-C, the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter or Title 22, chapter
558-C or any other applicable state or local law, rule or regulation for the purpose of issuing
licenses under this chapter.
Sec. 4. 28-B MRSA §206, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §38, is
further amended to read:
2. Good cause defined. As used in this section, "good cause" means a finding by the
office that:
A. An applicant or licensee has violated, does not meet or has failed to comply with
any of the provisions of this chapter, the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter or any
other applicable state or local law, rule or regulation; or
B. An applicant or licensee has failed to comply with any special terms, consent decree
or conditions placed upon the previously issued license pursuant to an order of the
office; the municipality in which the licensed premises are located; the town or
plantation in the unorganized and deorganized areas in which the licensed premises are
located; in the case of a township in the unorganized and deorganized areas in which
the licensed premises are located, the county commissioners of the county in which the
township is located; or, in the case of a cannabis establishment located in the
unorganized and deorganized areas, the Maine Land Use Planning Commission.; or
C. An applicant for a cultivation facility license or a cultivation facility licensee is
proposing to operate or operating a cultivation facility at a geographical location
subject to a moratorium pursuant to section 203-B or that has repeatedly violated, does
not meet or has failed to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or Title 22,
Page 1 - 132LR1546(01)

412 chapter 558-C, the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter or Title 22, chapter 558-C or
423 any other applicable state or local law, rule or regulation.
Sec. 5. 28-B MRSA §211, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Relocation prohibited; cultivation facility. A licensee may not relocate a
licensed cultivation facility to a geographical location subject to a moratorium pursuant to
section 203-B or that has been the site of repeated violations under this chapter or Title 22,
chapter 558-C, the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter or Title 22, chapter 558-C or any
other applicable state or local law, rule or regulation.